Maryland, session 2026, HB0693.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
SUBTITLE 27. DISTRIBUTION OF OBSCENE MATERIAL TO MINORS.
3–2701.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0693*

HOUSE BILL 693
(B) “COMMERCIAL ENTITY” MEANS A CORPORATION, LIMITED LIABILITY
COMPANY, PARTNERSHIP, LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, SOLE PROPRIETORSHIP, OR ANY
OTHER LEGALLY RECOGNIZED ENTITY.
(C) “DISTRIBUTE” MEANS TO ISSUE, SELL, GIVE, PUBLISH, PROVIDE,
DELIVER, TRANSFER, TRANSMIT, CIRCULATE, OR DISSEMINATE BY ANY MEANS.
(D) “NEWS–GATHERING ORGANIZATION EMPLOYEE” MEANS:
(1) AN EMPLOYEE OF A NEWSPAPER, NEWS PUBLICATION, OR NEWS
SOURCE, WHETHER IN PRINT OR ON AN ONLINE OR MOBILE PLATFORM, OF CURRENT
NEWS AND PUBLIC INTEREST, WHILE OPERATING AS AN EMPLOYEE, WHO CAN
PROVIDE DOCUMENTATION OF THE EMPLOYMENT; OR
(2) AN EMPLOYEE OF A RADIO BROADCAST STATION, TELEVISION
BROADCAST STATION, CABLE TELEVISION OPERATOR, OR WIRE SERVICE WHILE
OPERATING AS AN EMPLOYEE, WHO CAN PROVIDE DOCUMENTATION OF THE
EMPLOYMENT.
(E) “OBSCENE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–203 OF THE CRIMINAL
LAW ARTICLE.
(F) “REASONABLE AGE VERIFICATION METHODS” INCLUDES VERIFYING
THAT A PERSON SEEKING TO ACCESS MATERIAL IS AT LEAST 18 YEARS OLD BY
REQUIRING THE PERSON ATTEMPTING TO ACCESS THE MATERIAL TO COMPLY WITH
A COMMERCIAL AGE VERIFICATION SYSTEM THAT VERIFIES IN AT LEAST ONE OF THE
FOLLOWING WAYS:
(1) GOVERNMENT–ISSUED IDENTIFICATION; OR
(2) ANY COMMERCIALLY REASONABLE METHOD THAT RELIES ON
PUBLIC OR PRIVATE TRANSACTIONAL DATA TO VERIFY THAT THE PERSON
ATTEMPTING TO ACCESS THE INFORMATION IS AT LEAST 18 YEARS OLD.
(G) “SUBSTANTIAL PORTION” MEANS MORE THAN ONE–THIRD OF THE
TOTAL MATERIAL ON A WEBSITE.
(H) (1) “TRANSACTIONAL DATA” MEANS A SEQUENCE OF INFORMATION
THAT DOCUMENTS AN EXCHANGE, AN AGREEMENT, OR A TRANSFER BETWEEN AN
INDIVIDUAL, A COMMERCIAL ENTITY, OR A THIRD PARTY USED FOR THE PURPOSE
OF SATISFYING A REQUEST OR AN EVENT.

HOUSE BILL 693 3
(2) “TRANSACTIONAL DATA” INCLUDES RECORDS FROM MORTGAGE,
EDUCATION, AND EMPLOYMENT ENTITIES.
3–2702.
(A) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO IMPOSE LIABILITY ON AN
INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER, AN INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER’S AFFILIATES OR
SUBSIDIARIES, A SEARCH ENGINE, OR A CLOUD SERVICE PROVIDER, SOLELY FOR
PROVIDING ACCESS OR CONNECTION TO OR FROM A WEBSITE OR OTHER
INFORMATION OR CONTENT ON THE INTERNET OR A FACILITY, SYSTEM, OR
NETWORK NOT UNDER THE SERVICE PROVIDER’S CONTROL INCLUDING
TRANSMISSION, DOWNLOADING, INTERMEDIATE STORAGE, ACCESS SOFTWARE, OR
OTHER SERVICE TO THE EXTENT THAT THE SERVICE PROVIDER IS NOT
RESPONSIBLE FOR THE CREATION OR COMMUNICATION OF THE OBSCENE
MATERIAL.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO ANY BONA FIDE NEWS OR PUBLIC
INTEREST BROADCAST, WEBSITE VIDEO, REPORT, OR EVENT AND MAY NOT BE
CONSTRUED TO AFFECT THE RIGHTS OF ANY NEWS–GATHERING ORGANIZATION
EMPLOYEES.
(C) (1) A COMMERCIAL ENTITY THAT KNOWINGLY AND INTENTIONALLY
DISTRIBUTES OBSCENE MATERIAL ON THE INTERNET FROM A WEBSITE THAT
CONTAINS A SUBSTANTIAL PORTION OF OBSCENE MATERIAL SHALL PERFORM
REASONABLE AGE VERIFICATION METHODS TO VERIFY THE AGE OF INDIVIDUALS
ATTEMPTING TO ACCESS THE MATERIAL.
(2) A COMMERCIAL ENTITY OR THIRD PARTY THAT PERFORMS AN
AGE VERIFICATION REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT RETAIN ANY
IDENTIFYING INFORMATION ABOUT INDIVIDUALS ATTEMPTING TO ACCESS
OBSCENE MATERIAL AFTER ACCESS TO THE MATERIAL HAS BEEN GRANTED OR
DENIED.
(D) (1) A PERSON MAY BRING AN ACTION AGAINST A COMMERCIAL
ENTITY THAT VIOLATES SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION FOR DAMAGES
RESULTING FROM:
(I) A MINOR’S ACCESSING OF OBSCENE MATERIAL; OR
(II) THE RETENTION OF IDENTIFYING INFORMATION OF AN
INDIVIDUAL.

HOUSE BILL 693
(2) A COURT MAY AWARD COSTS AND REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES
TO A PREVAILING PLAINTIFF UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.